Illinois, session 104th, SB693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Maternal Mental Health Conditions 5Education, Early Diagnosis, and Treatment Act is amended by 6changing Section 1 as follows: 7    (405 ILCS 120/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Maternal Mental Health Conditions Education, Early Diagnosis, 10and Treatment Act.11(Source: P.A. 101-512, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)